Utah statutes.
7-23-103.1.   Exemptions.

The following are not subject to the requirements of this chapter:

(1)  a depository institution;

(2)  a depository institution holding company;

(3)  an institution directly or indirectly owned or controlled by one or more:

(a)  depository institutions; or

(b)  depository institution holding companies; or

(4)  a person that cashes a check in a transaction:

(a)  that is incidental to a retail sale of goods or services; and

(b)  for consideration that does not exceed the greater of:

(i)  1% of the amount of the check; or

(ii) $1.

